California statutes. Education Code
(2) That some schoolage individuals with exceptional needs have significant behavioral challenges that have an adverse impact on their learning or the learning of other pupils, or both.

(3) That Section 1400(c)(5)(F) of Title 20 of the United States Code states that
 research and experience demonstrate that the education of children with disabilities can be made more effective by providing incentives for positive behavioral interventions and supports to address the learning and behavioral needs of those children.

(4) That procedures for the elimination of maladaptive behaviors shall not include those deemed unacceptable under Section 49001 or those that cause pain or trauma.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature:

(1) That children exhibiting serious behavioral challenges receive timely and appropriate assessments and positive supports and interventions in accordance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(2) That assessments and
 positive behavioral interventions and supports be developed and implemented in a manner informed by guidance from the United States Department of Education and technical assistance centers sponsored by the Office of Special Education Programs of the United States Department of Education.

(3) That when behavioral interventions, supports, and other strategies are used, they be used in consideration of the pupil’s physical freedom and social interaction, be administered in a manner that respects human dignity and personal privacy, and that ensure a pupil’s right to placement in the least restrictive educational environment.

(4) That behavioral intervention plans be developed and used, to the extent possible, in a consistent manner when the pupil is also the responsibility of another agency for residential care or related services.

(5) That training programs be developed and implemented in institutions of higher education that train teachers and that in-service training programs be made available as necessary in school districts and county offices of education to ensure that adequately trained staff are available to work effectively with the behavioral intervention needs of individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 41.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

56521.

(a) This chapter applies to any individual with exceptional needs who is in a public school program, including a state school for the disabled pursuant to Part 32 (commencing with Section 59000), or who is placed in a nonpublic school program pursuant to Sections 56365 to 56366.5, inclusive.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall monitor and supervise the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 38.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

56521.1.

(a) Emergency interventions may only be used to control unpredictable, spontaneous behavior that poses clear and present danger of serious physical harm to the individual with exceptional needs, or others, and that cannot be immediately prevented by a response less restrictive than the temporary application of a technique used to contain the behavior.

(b) Emergency interventions shall not be used as a substitute for the systematic behavioral intervention plan that is designed to change, replace, modify, or eliminate a targeted behavior.

(c) No emergency intervention shall be employed for longer than is necessary to contain
 the behavior. A situation that requires prolonged use of an emergency intervention shall require the staff to seek assistance of the schoolsite administrator or law enforcement agency, as applicable to the situation.

(d) Emergency interventions shall not include:

(1) Locked seclusion, unless it is in a facility otherwise licensed or permitted by state law to use a locked room.

(2) Employment of a device, material, or objects that simultaneously immobilize all four extremities.

(3) Prone restraint.

(4) An amount of force that exceeds that which is reasonable and necessary under the
 circumstances.

(e) To prevent emergency interventions from being used in lieu of planned, systematic behavioral interventions, the parent, guardian, and residential care provider, if appropriate, shall be notified within one schoolday if an emergency intervention is used or serious property damage occurs. A behavioral emergency report shall immediately be completed and maintained in the file of the individual with exceptional needs. The behavioral emergency report shall include all of the following:

(1) The name and age of the individual with exceptional needs.

(2) The setting and location of the incident.

(3) The name of the staff or other persons involved.

(4) A description of the incident and the emergency intervention used, and whether the individual with exceptional needs is currently engaged in any systematic behavioral intervention plan.

(5) Details of any injuries sustained by the individual with exceptional needs, or others, including staff, as a result of the incident.

(f) All behavioral emergency reports shall immediately be forwarded to, and reviewed by, a designated responsible administrator.

(g) If a behavioral emergency report is written regarding an individual with exceptional needs who does not have a behavioral intervention plan, the designated responsible administrator shall, within two
 days, schedule an individualized education program (IEP) team meeting to review the emergency report, to determine the necessity for a functional behavioral assessment, and to determine the necessity for an interim plan. The IEP team shall document the reasons for not conducting the functional behavioral assessment, not developing an interim plan, or both.

(h) If a behavioral emergency report is written regarding an individual with exceptional needs who has a positive behavioral intervention plan, an incident involving a previously unseen serious behavior problem, or where a previously designed intervention is ineffective, shall be referred to the IEP team to review and determine if the incident constitutes a need to modify the positive behavioral intervention plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 857, Sec. 5.   (SB 483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56521.2.

(a) A local educational agency or nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency serving individuals with exceptional needs pursuant to Sections 56365 and 56366, shall not authorize, order, consent to, or pay for the following interventions, or any other interventions similar to or like the following:

(1) Any intervention that is designed to, or likely to, cause physical pain, including, but not limited to, electric shock.

(2) An intervention that involves the release of noxious, toxic, or otherwise unpleasant sprays, mists, or substances in proximity to the face of the individual.

(3) An intervention that denies adequate sleep, food, water, shelter, bedding, physical comfort, or access to bathroom facilities.

(4) An intervention that is designed to subject, used to subject, or likely to subject, the individual to verbal abuse, ridicule, or humiliation, or that can be expected to cause excessive emotional trauma.

(5) Restrictive interventions that employ a device, material, or objects that simultaneously immobilize all four extremities.

(6) Prone restraint.

(7) Locked seclusion, unless it is in a facility otherwise licensed or permitted by state law to use a locked room.

(8) An intervention that precludes adequate supervision of the individual.

(9) An intervention that deprives the individual of one or more of the individual’s senses.

(b) In the case of a child whose behavior impedes the child’s learning or that of others, the individualized education program team shall consider the use of positive behavioral interventions and supports, and other strategies, to address that behavior, consistent with Section 1414(d)(3)(B)(i) and (d)(4) of Title 20 of the United States Code and associated federal regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 857, Sec. 6.   (SB 483)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56523.

(a) The Superintendent shall repeal those regulations governing the use of behavioral interventions with individuals with exceptional needs receiving special education and related services that are no longer supported by statute, including Section 3052 and subdivisions (d), (e), (f), (g), and (ab) of Section 3001 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as those provisions existed on January 10, 2013.

(b) This chapter is necessary to implement the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and associated federal regulations. This chapter is intended to provide the clarity, definition, and specificity necessary for local educational agencies to comply with the federal
 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and shall be implemented by local educational agencies without the development by the Superintendent and adoption by the state board of any additional regulations.

(c) Pursuant to Section 1401(9) of Title 20 of the United States Code, special education and related services must meet the standards of the department.

(d) As a condition of receiving funding from the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), a local educational agency shall agree to adhere to this chapter and implementing federal regulations set forth in this chapter.

(e) The Superintendent may monitor local educational agency compliance with this chapter and may take appropriate action, including fiscal repercussions, if either of the
 following is found:

(1) The local educational agency failed to comply with this chapter and failed to comply substantially with corrective action orders issued by the department resulting from monitoring findings or complaint investigations.

(2) The local educational agency failed to implement the decision of a due process hearing officer based on noncompliance with this part, provisions of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or the federal implementing regulations, wherein noncompliance resulted in the denial of, or impeded the delivery of, a free appropriate public education for an individual with exceptional needs.

(f) Commencing with the 2010–11 fiscal year, if any activities authorized pursuant to this chapter and implementing regulations are found be a state
 reimbursable mandate pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, state funding provided for purposes of special education pursuant to Item 6110-161-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act shall first be used to directly offset any mandated costs.

(g) The Legislature hereby requests the Department of Finance on or before December 31, 2013, to exercise its authority pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17557 of the Government Code to file a request with the Commission on State Mandates for the purpose of amending the parameters and guidelines of CSM-4464 to delete any reimbursable activities that have been repealed by statute or executive order and to update offsetting revenues that apply to the mandated program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 44.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

56524.

The superintendent shall explore with representatives of institutions of higher education and the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the current training requirements for teachers to ensure that sufficient training is available in appropriate behavioral interventions for people entering the field of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

56525.

(a) A person recognized by the national Behavior Analyst Certification Board as a Board Certified Behavior Analyst may conduct behavior assessments and provide behavioral intervention services for individuals with exceptional needs.

(b) This section does not require a district, special education local plan area, or county office to use a Board Certified Behavior Analyst to conduct behavior assessments and provide behavioral intervention services for individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 45.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Evaluation, Audits, and Information [56600. - 56606.]

56600.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for ongoing comprehensive evaluation of special education programs authorized by this part and to support the purposes of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), pursuant to subsection (d) of Section 1400 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 492, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

56600.6.

(a) The Superintendent shall ensure that pupil and program performance results are monitored at the state and local levels in order to comply with Section 1412(a)(15) of Title 20 of the United States Code by evaluating pupil performance against key performance indicators. As necessary, other data may be collected to support the state’s participation in national studies and evaluations described in Section 1474(a) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) The Superintendent shall monitor, provide technical assistance, and enforce this part, and Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) in accordance with Section 1416 of Title 20 of the United States Code, and Subpart F (commencing with Section 300.600) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and annually report to the United States Department of Education on performance.

(c) Pursuant to Section 300.600(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the primary focus of the state’s monitoring activities shall be on the following:

(1) Improving educational results and functional outcomes for all individuals with exceptional needs.

(2) Ensuring that public agencies meet the program requirements under this part and under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), with a particular emphasis on those requirements that are most closely related to improving educational results for individuals with exceptional needs.

(d) As part of state monitoring and enforcement, the Superintendent shall use quantifiable indicators and qualitative indicators as are needed to adequately measure performance in the indicators established by the United States Secretary of Education, and in the following priority areas specified in Section 300.600(d) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations:

(1) Provision of a free appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment.

(2) State exercise of general supervision, including child find, effective monitoring, the use of resolution meetings, mediation, and a system of transition services as defined in Section 1437(a)(9) of Title 20 of the United States Code and in Section 300.43 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Disproportionate representation of racial and ethnic groups in special education and related services, to the extent the representation is the result of inappropriate identification.

(e) As part of the performance plan of the state, as required in Section 300.601 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Superintendent shall collect valid and reliable information as needed to report annually to the United States Secretary of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 34.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56601.

(a) Each special education local plan area shall submit to the Superintendent at least annually information, in a form and manner prescribed by the Superintendent and developed in consultation with the special education local plan areas, in order for the Superintendent to carry out the evaluation responsibilities pursuant to Section 56602. This information shall include other statistical data, program information, and fiscal information that the Superintendent may require. The Superintendent shall use this information to answer questions from the Legislature and other state and federal agencies on program, policy, and fiscal issues of statewide interest.

(b) In order to assist the state in evaluating the effectiveness of special education programs, including
 transition and work experience programs, the Superintendent shall, commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year and phased in over a two-year period, assign a pupil identification number to individuals with exceptional needs for purposes of evaluating special education programs and related services. The Superintendent shall not disclose personally identifiable, individual pupil records to any person, institution, agency, or organization except as authorized by Section 1232g of Title 20 of the United States Code and Part 99 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 42.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56601.5.

Pursuant to Section 1413(a)(7) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.211 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, each special education local plan area annually shall report to the Superintendent the number of pupils receiving special education services participating in the regular school and district assessments and the number participating in an alternate assessment process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56602.

Pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (16) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 80.40 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the superintendent shall submit to the board, the Legislature, and the Governor, a biennial performance report of the special education programs implemented under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 492, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

56604.

(a) The superintendent shall coordinate the design of evaluations to prevent duplication and to minimize data collection and reporting requirements at the school and district levels.

(b) The State Department of Education shall utilize sampling procedures whenever feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1508, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

56605.

The superintendent shall periodically sponsor or conduct workshops and seminars for the education of local education agency personnel assigned to, and responsible for, the evaluation of local special education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1508, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

56606.

The Superintendent shall provide for onsite program and fiscal reviews of the implementation of plans approved under this part. In performing the reviews and audits, the Superintendent may utilize the services of persons outside of the department chosen for their knowledge of special education programs. A special education local plan area shall be reviewed at least once during the period of approval of its local plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.2. Special Education Funding [56836. - 56845.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [56836. - 56836.05.]

56836.

Commencing with the 1998–99 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, apportionments to special education local plan areas for special education programs operated by, and services provided by, districts, county offices, and special education local plan areas shall be computed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.01.

Commencing with the 1998–99 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the administrator of each special education local plan area, in accordance with the local plan approved by the board, shall be responsible for the following:

(a) The fiscal administration of the annual budget plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 56205 and annual allocation plan for multidistrict special education local plan areas pursuant to Section 56836.05 for special education programs of school districts and county superintendents of schools composing the special education local plan area.

(b) The allocation of state and federal funds allocated to the special education local plan area for the provision of special education and related services by those entities.

(c) The reporting and accounting requirements prescribed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 62.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.02.

(a) The Superintendent shall apportion funds from Section A of the State School Fund to districts and county offices of education in accordance with the allocation plan adopted pursuant to Section 56836.05, unless the allocation plan specifies that funds be apportioned to the administrative unit of the special education local plan area. If the allocation plan specifies that funds be apportioned to the administrative unit of the special education local plan area, the administrator of the special education local plan area shall, upon receipt, distribute the funds in accordance with the method adopted pursuant to
 subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7. The allocation plan shall, before submission to the Superintendent, be approved according to the local policymaking process established by the special education local plan area.

(b) The Superintendent shall apportion funds for regionalized services and program specialists from Section A of the State School Fund to the administrative unit of each special education local plan area. Upon receipt, the administrator of a special education local plan area shall direct the administrative unit of the special education local plan area to distribute the funds in accordance with the annual budget plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 56205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 96.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.03.

(a) On or after January 1, 1998, each special education local plan area shall submit a revised local plan. Each special education local plan area shall submit its revised local plan not later than the time it is required to submit its local plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56100 and the revised local plan shall meet the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56205).

(b) Until the board has approved the revised local plan and the special education local plan area begins to operate under the revised local plan, each special education local plan area shall continue to operate under the programmatic, reporting, and accounting requirements prescribed by the State Department of Education for the purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700) as that chapter existed on December 31, 1998. The department shall develop transition guidelines, and, as necessary, transition forms, to facilitate a transition from the reporting and accounting methods required for Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700) as that chapter existed on December 31, 1998, and related provisions of this part, to the reporting and accounting methods required for this chapter. Under no circumstances shall the transition guidelines exceed the requirements of the provisions described in paragraphs (1) and (2). The transition guidelines shall, at a minimum, do the following:

(1) Describe the method for accounting for the instructional service personnel units and caseloads, as required by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700) as that chapter existed on December 31, 1998.

(2) Describe the accounting that is required to be made, if any, for the purposes of Sections 56030, 56140, 56156.4, 56361.5, 56362, 56363.3, 56366.2, 56366.3, 56441.5, and 56441.7.

(c) Commencing with the 1997–98 fiscal year, through and including the fiscal year in which equalization among special education local plan areas has been achieved, the board shall not approve any proposal to divide a special education local plan area into two or more units, unless the division has no net impact on state costs for special education; provided, however, that the board may approve a proposal that was initially submitted to the department prior to January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 63.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.04.

(a) The Superintendent continuously shall monitor and review all special education programs approved under this part to ensure that all funds appropriated to special education local plan areas under this part are expended for the purposes intended.

(b) Funds apportioned to special education local plan areas pursuant to this chapter are to assist local educational agencies to provide special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs and shall be expended exclusively for programs operated under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.045.

For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall only make the computations described in Sections 56836.14, 56836.142, 56836.144, 56836.146, 56836.148, and 56836.15 upon receiving a joint notification from the Director of Finance, or the director’s designee, and the chairperson and vice chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or their designees, that a bill providing for appropriations related to the budget bill, within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, that is identified in the Budget Act of 2022 makes statutory changes designed to improve the academic outcomes of individuals with exceptional needs. These statutory changes may include, but are not limited to, all of the following topics:

(a) Clarification of the roles of local educational agencies and special education local plan areas in the delivery of special education services and supports for pupils with disabilities, including improved alignment between special education and general education program development, budgeting and continuous improvement, in a manner that aligns with the statewide system of support.

(b) Statutory changes to the existing funding allocations for special education to improve services and supports to pupils with disabilities.

(c) Expansion of early intervention and inclusive practices to ensure that every individual with exceptional needs has access to learn in the least restrictive environment, as appropriate.

(d) Additional statutory changes that may result from the examinations into special education
 services and supports as authorized in Section 50 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2019, and Provisions 23, 24, and 25 in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-001-0890 of Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 96.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.05.

(a) Apportionments made under this part shall be made by the superintendent as early as practicable in the fiscal year. Upon order of the superintendent, the Controller shall draw warrants upon the money appropriated, in favor of the eligible special education local plan areas. 

(b) If the special education local plan area is a multidistrict special education local plan area, and the approved allocation plan does not specify that funds will be apportioned to the special education local plan area administrative unit, the special education local plan area shall submit to the superintendent an annual allocation plan to allocate funds received in accordance with this chapter among the local educational agencies within the special education local plan area. The annual allocation plan may be revised during any fiscal year, and these revisions may be submitted to the superintendent as amendments. The amendments shall, prior to submission to the superintendent, be approved according to the policymaking process established by the special education local plan area.

(c) If funds are apportioned to a special education local plan area administrative unit in the 1998–99 fiscal year and the special education local plan area administrative unit is changed in the 1998–99 fiscal year or thereafter, monthly payments shall be made according to the schedule in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14041 unless all local educational agencies are on the same schedule. If all local educational agencies are on the same schedule, the appropriate schedule in paragraph (2), (7), or (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 14041 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 49.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computation of Apportionments [56836.06. - 56836.13.]

56836.06.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms or phrases have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) “Average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area” means the total of the following:

(A) The total number of units of average daily attendance reported for the second principal apportionment pursuant to Section 41601 for all pupils enrolled in the district or districts that are a part of the special education local plan area.

(B) The total number of units of average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 41601 for all pupils
 enrolled in schools operated by the county office or offices that
 comprise the special education local plan area, or for those county offices that are a part of more than one special education local plan area, that portion of the average daily attendance of pupils enrolled in the schools operated by the county office that are under the jurisdiction of the special education local plan area.

(2) For purposes of computing apportionments pursuant to this chapter for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the term “average daily attendance” means the total number of units of average daily attendance reported for the second principal apportionment pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 41601 for all pupils enrolled in districts within the County of Los Angeles and all schools operated by the Los Angeles County Office of Education
 and the districts within the County of Los Angeles.

(3) “Special education local plan area” includes the school district or districts and county office or offices of education comprising the special education local plan area.

(4) “The fiscal year in which equalization among special education local plan areas has been achieved” means the first fiscal year in which each special education local plan area is funded at or above the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance, as computed pursuant to Section 56836.11.

(5) For a charter school deemed a local educational agency for purposes of special
 education, an amount equal to the amount computed pursuant to Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area in which the charter school is included shall be apportioned by the department pursuant to the local allocation plan developed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or 56836.05, or both.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 23.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.07.

(a) For the 2004–05 fiscal year to the 2019–20 fiscal year, inclusive, to the extent there is an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for purposes of educationally related mental health services, the Superintendent shall allocate funds per unit of average daily attendance, as defined in Section 56836.06, reported for the special education local plan area. For the 2004–05 fiscal year to the 2019–20 fiscal year, inclusive, for which there is an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent shall determine a proportionate share, consistent with existing law, to the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area based on the ratio of the amount per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.10
 to the amount of the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to Section 56836.11.

(b) For the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 fiscal years, to the extent there is an appropriation of federal funds in the annual Budget Act for purposes of educationally related mental health services, the Superintendent shall allocate funds per unit of average daily attendance, as defined in Section 56836.06, reported for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year as of the second
 principal apportionment. For the
 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 fiscal
 years, to the extent there is an appropriation of federal funds in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent shall determine a proportionate share, consistent with existing law, to the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area based on the ratio of the amount per unit of average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.10 to the amount of the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.11.

(c) For the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 fiscal
 years,
 to the extent there is a General Fund appropriation in the annual Budget Act for purposes of mental health-related services, the Superintendent shall allocate funds per unit of average daily attendance, as defined in Section 56836.06, reported for the special education local plan area for the 2019–20 fiscal year as of the second principal apportionment. For the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 fiscal years, to the extent there is a General Fund appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent shall determine a proportionate share,
 consistent with existing law, to the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area based on the ratio of the amount per unit of average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.10 to the amount of the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance for the 2019–20 fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.11.

(d) For the 2023–24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, to the extent there is an appropriation of federal funds in the annual Budget Act for purposes of educationally related mental health services, the Superintendent shall allocate funds per unit of average daily attendance, as defined in Section 56836.144, reported for the local educational agency for the prior fiscal year as of the second principal apportionment. For
 the 2023–24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter for which there is an appropriation of federal funds in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent shall determine a proportionate share, consistent with existing law, to the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community Schools based on the ratio of the amount per unit of average daily attendance for the prior fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.146.

(e) For the 2023–24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, to the extent there is a General Fund appropriation in the annual Budget Act for purposes of mental health-related services, the Superintendent shall allocate funds per unit of average daily attendance, as defined in Section 56836.144, reported for the local educational agency for the current fiscal year as of the second principal apportionment. For the 2023–24 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter for which there is a General Fund
 appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent shall determine a proportionate share, consistent with existing law, to the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community Schools based on the ratio of the amount per unit of average daily attendance for the current fiscal year determined pursuant to Section 56836.146.

(f) For the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the General Fund appropriations specified in
 subdivisions (c) and (e) shall be available for all mental health-related services for pupils with or without an individualized education program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils.

(2) Counseling and guidance services, including counseling, personal counseling, and parental counseling and training.

(3) Psychological services.

(4) Social work services.

(5) Behavioral interventions.

(6) Any other mental health-related service not necessarily required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities
 Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 91.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.08.

(a) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding for each special education local plan area:

(1) Add the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.10 to the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to subdivision (d) for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the units of average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area for the 1997–98 fiscal year, excluding
 average daily attendance for absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010, as that subdivision read on July 1, 1996.

(3) Add the actual amount of the equalization adjustment, if any, computed for the 1998–99 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.14 to the amount computed in paragraph (2).

(4) Add or subtract, as appropriate, the adjustment for growth computed pursuant to Section 56836.13 from the amount computed in paragraph (3).

(b) (1) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding for each special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation
 is made:
